Massachusetts, session 194th, H2788.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the clause “employees of the Massachusetts Port Authority
who are employed as licensed electricians, utility technicians, steam engineers, watch engineers,
boiler operators,” the following words:- “licensed pipefitters and refrigeration technicians.”
of 1